src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON FRIIJA  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  loans ending with -a, same attr as pred
 :%> ATTR ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
! :%> LAIKI0 ; replaced by individual pointers
 +Use/-PLX:%> VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation
 +Sg+Ill:X2s%> NPxC ;
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! :X4 GOADIadj- ; replaced by individual pointers
 FRIIJA_CG ;
! +Sg+Nom:X2 NPx1V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Gen:X2 NPx1V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Acc:X2 NPx1V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Nom:X2 NPx2V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Gen:X6 NPx2V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Acc:X6 NPx2V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Gen:X4 NPx3V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Acc:X4 NPx3V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Sg+Nom: NPx3V ; !ikke i bruk
! +Ess:n%> NPxC ; !ikke i bruk
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
! +Cmp/Attr+Err/Orth:X4 R ;
 +Cmp/Attr: R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 ! +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X4 R ; Away with this and Cmp/Attr instead
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ; ! Away with this and Cmp/Attr instead

LEXICON FRIIJA_CG
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 :%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:X4st%> NPxC ;
 :^DISIMP GODIIadj- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Attr+Err/Orth:%>det K ;



LEXICON BOREALA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** FRIIJA without comparatives
 :%> ATTR ;
 :%> LAIKI0 ;




LEXICON SPANSKA !!≈ * **@CODE@** spánska, dánska, fránska, ránska. WeG attr
 :skka%> ATTR ;
 :sºka%> GOAHTI-OBLadj ;
 +Sg+Nom:sºka K ;
 +Sg+Nom:sºka%> NPx3V ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:ska R ;
 +Ess:n K ;


LEXICON ALLAT !!≈ * **@CODE@** allat, gassat, govdat, attr: alla, gassa, govda. Trisyllables with Bisyllable compforms: alit, gasit, govddit
 :a%> ATTR ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:adat K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Attr:i%>X4t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Attr+Err/Orth:adit K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Attr+Err/Orth:adat K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Attr+Err/Orth:adet K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:ad%>eabbo EABBU_ERRforms ; !SUB?
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:ad%>abºbo EABBU_ERRforms ; !SUB?
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:i%>X4b K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu K ;
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:i%>X4b K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:i%>X4but K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Ess:i%>X4bun K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4buš%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:i»X4bužž K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:i»X4bužž%> R ;			! test this
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Cmp/SgGen:i»X4bužž%> R ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:i%>X4bu MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ad%>eappo%>t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:ad%>eabbo%>t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:ad%>eabbu%>t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>eappo%>t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ad%>abbo%>t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>abbo%>t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu%> NPx2V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu%> NPx3V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu%> NPx2V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu%> NPx3V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu%> NPx2V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu%> NPx3V ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill:i%>X4bu%>sa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:i%>X4buiddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Attr:i%>X4mus K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4muss K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:i%>X4muss%> R ;			! test this
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Cmp/SgGen:i%>X4muss%> R ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ad%>epmos%>it K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>epmos%>it K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ad%>amos%>it K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:ag%>amos%>it K ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom:i%>X4mussa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:i%>X4mussa%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:ad%>eapmos EAMOS_ERRforms ; 
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:ad%>eapmus EAMOS_ERRforms ; 
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Err/Orth:ad%>amos EAMOS_ERRforms ; 
 :ad ALLAGA ;
 +Use/NG:ag ALLAGA ;
 :ad%> ADVC ;
 +Use/NG:ag%> ADVC ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:i%>X4musat K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:i%>X4but K ;


LEXICON ALLAGA !!≈ * **@CODE@** sublexicon to ALLAT and word árrat
 00:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ; !^B^ doesn't work ...
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:»X7 NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
 :»X7# NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
! +Cmp/SgNom#+Use/-PLX:»X7 NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.





!! ## Contracted adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON FIINNIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ,-dná-(:Ø)#fiinna, western comp: fiidnát, eastern comp: fiidnásabbo/-sut/-sat
 :a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +Dial/-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ; !
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +Ess+Err/Orth:án K ; !
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
! +Dial/-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;
 :ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !


 LEXICON DEAHTIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  as fiinnis, but with StrGr in Attr
 :%>a ATTR ;
 +Dial/-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  !
 :ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
! +Dial/-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;

LEXICON SMAVIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  as deahtis, but with even more Attr forms and comparative smávit in addition
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! smávit
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! smávimus
 :ás%> ADVC ;
 :%>a ATTR ;
 +Use/NG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  !
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +Use/NG:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
! +Dial/-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ;
 :ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !

LEXICON STUORIS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  As fiinnis, but with different comparation
 +Dial/-KJ:a%>X4 ATTR ; !
 +Dial/-KJ+Err/Orth-a-á:á%>X4 ATTR ; !
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:á%>Y5t K ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-KJ:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorit
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-GG:á%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorát
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:a%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorat
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Dial/-KJ:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorimus
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Dial/-GG:á%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorámus
 :á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;

LEXICON NJALGGAT !!≈ * **@CODE@** Comp+Sg+Nom: njálgát, njálgásut/-sit/-sut/-sat, njálgáseabbo/-sabbo
 :a%>X4 ATTR ; !njálgga
 :ah%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
! +Dial/-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  !
 :á%>Y5 BU/MUS ; !
 :á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
! +Use/NG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !
 +Ess+Err/Orth:án K ; !

LEXICON CAPPIS !!≈ * **@CODE@**  western comp: čábbát, eastern comp: čábbásabbo/-sut/-sat
 :a%>X4 ATTR ; !njálgga
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +Dial/-GG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ;  !
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 :á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 :ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !


LEXICON VIISSIS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es/-is, western and eastern comp forms
 :es%>X4 ATTR ;
 +Err/Orth:is%>X4 ATTR ; !
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Dial/-KJ+Use/NG:át SHORTCOMP ;
 +Dial/-GG+Use/NG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted ; !
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;  !
 +Dial/-KJ:á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ; !
 !+Dial/-GG:á%>Y5s MALLASadj- ; !
 +Use/NG:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !
 
LEXICON isCONTR_forms 
 +Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:át SHORTCOMP ;

LEXICON RAHPIS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es, with long and short comp forms
 :es%>X4 ATTR ;
 :is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:át SHORTCOMP ;
 :á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 :á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
 +Err/Orth:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;  !

LEXICON HARVVIS_CGforms   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -e, short comp forms
! +Der2+Der/Comp+A:át SHORTCOMP ;
 :i%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 :á%>Y5 VUDDJI- ;
