src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective !!= * **@CODE@** is a long list of lexicalised eahpe-prefixed adjs
eahpeprofessionealla+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+CmpNP/First+Sem/Hum:eahpe#professionealºla FRIIJA ;
eahpevissis+v2+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+CmpNP/First+Dial/-GG+Sem/Hum:eahpe#visºs VIISSIS ;  !OK
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
akuhtta+A+Sem/Dummytag:akuhtta FRIIJA ;
allat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:all ALLAT ;
beallepriváhtta+A+Sem/Dummytag:bealle#priváhtta BOREALA ;
bipolára+A+Sem/Dummytag:bi#polára BOREALA ;
deahtis+A+Sem/Dummytag:deahtt DEAHTIS ;
demeanta+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:demeanºta FRIIJA ;
dentála+A+Sem/Dummytag:dentála BOREALA ;
dáhpáhusrikkis+A+Sem/Dummytag:dáhpáhus#rigg VIISSIS ;
dánska+A+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dán SPANSKA ;
eksperimentála+A+Sem/Dummytag:eks^perimentála BOREALA ;
ekstrema+A+Sem/Dummytag:ekstrema FRIIJA ;
fiinnis+A+Sem/Dummytag:fijdn FIINNIS "fine A" ;
finihta+A+Sem/Dummytag:finihta BOREALA ;
formála+A+Sem/Dummytag:formála FRIIJA ;
friskkis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:frisºk DEAHTIS ;
fránska+A+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:frán SPANSKA ;
funktionála+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:funkšunála FRIIJA ; !
føderála+A+Sem/Dummytag:føderála BOREALA ;
gaskastuoris+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gaska#stuorr STUORIS ;
gassat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gass ALLAT ;
govdat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:govºd ALLAT ;
govdat+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:gobºd ALLAT ; !South
guollerikkis+A+Sem/Dummytag:guolle#rigg VIISSIS ;
gárvvis+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:gárºv HARVVIS_CGforms ; !Sub?
habituála+A+Sem/Dummytag:habituála BOREALA ;
homogena+A+Sem/Dummytag:homoge7na FRIIJA ;
ideationála+A+Sem/Dummytag:ide^ationála BOREALA ;
individuella+A+Sem/Dummytag:individu^elºla FRIIJA ;
industriála+A+Sem/Dummytag:indu^stri^ála BOREALA ;
intellektuála+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:intellektu^ála FRIIJA ;
internationála+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:inter#nášunala BOREALA ; !
jáfofiinnis+A+Sem/Dummytag:jáfo7#fijdn FIINNIS ;
kommunála+A+Sem/Dummytag:kommunála BOREALA ;
konsekveanta+A+Sem/Dummytag:konsekveanºta FRIIJA ;
kontekstuála+A+Sem/Dummytag:kontekstuála BOREALA ;
leksikála+A+Sem/Dummytag:leksikála BOREALA ;
lodderikkis+A+Sem/Dummytag:lodde#rigg VIISSIS ;
luonddučáppat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:luonddu#čább NJALGGAT ;
luonddučáppis+A+Sem/Dummytag:luonddu#čább CAPPIS "beautiful A" ;
mediála+A+Sem/Dummytag:medi^ála BOREALA ;
minimála+A+Sem/Dummytag:minimála FRIIJA ;
morfologiijarikkis+A+Sem/Dummytag:morfologiija#rigg VIISSIS ;
multifunktionála+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:multi#funkšunála FRIIJA ; !
neahtis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:neahtt DEAHTIS ;
njálggat+A+Sem/Dummytag:njálºg NJALGGAT "sweet A" ;
njálggis+A+Sem/Dummytag:njálºg CAPPIS ;
ollu+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:holºlu BOREALA ;
originála+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:originála FRIIJA ; !
personála+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:persunála BOREALA ;
priváhta+A+Sem/Dummytag:priváhta FRIIJA ;
professionála+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:professionála FRIIJA ;
psykososiála+A+Sem/Dummytag:psykososi^ála BOREALA ;
egaliteara+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:egaliteara FRIIJA ; !
rikkis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:rigg VIISSIS ;
ráhpis+A+Sem/Dummytag:ráhpp RAHPIS ;
sekundára+A+Sem/Dummytag:sekundára BOREALA ;
sosiálaemotionála+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:sosi^ála#emošunála FRIIJA ;
spiehkastatallat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:spiehkastat#all ALLAT ;
spiehkastatstuoris+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:spiehkastat#stuorr STUORIS ;
spánska+A+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:spán SPANSKA ;
sroaŋggis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sroaŋºg DEAHTIS ;
stroaŋggis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stroaŋºg DEAHTIS ;
stuoris+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stuorr STUORIS ;
super-čáppat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:super-čább NJALGGAT ;
sátnerikkis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sátne#rigg VIISSIS ;
teahtis+A+Sem/Dummytag:teahtt DEAHTIS ;
transseksuála+A+Sem/Dummytag:trans#seksu^ála BOREALA ;
verbála+A+Sem/Dummytag:verbála FRIIJA ;
viiddis+A+Sem/Dummytag:vijºd VIISSIS ;
viissis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vijºs VIISSIS ;
vissis+v2+A+Sem/Hum+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Dial/-GG:visºs VIISSIS ;  !OK
váttis+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:vádd isCONTR_forms ;
árrat+A+Sem/Dummytag:árrad ALLAGA ;
čáppat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:čább NJALGGAT ;
čáppis+A+Sem/Dummytag:čább CAPPIS "beautiful A" ;
pena+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:pena FRIIJA ; !LIA
ueniga+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:ueniga FRIIJA ; !LIA
